Utah statutes.
72-5-116.   Exemption from state licensure.

In accordance with Section 61-2f-202, an employee or authorized agent working under the oversight of the department when engaging in an act on behalf of the department related to one or more of the following is exempt from licensure under Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act:

(1)  acquiring real estate pursuant to Section 72-5-103;

(2)  disposing of real estate pursuant to Section 72-5-111;

(3)  providing services that constitute property management, as defined in Section 61-2f-102; or

(4)  leasing of real estate.



Amended by Chapter 379, 2010 General Session

